Texas statutes.
NATURAL RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 2. PUBLIC DOMAIN

SUBTITLE E. BEACHES AND DUNES

CHAPTER 62. BEACH PARK BOARD OF TRUSTEES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 62.001. APPLICABILITY. (a) The provisions of this chapter apply to counties that are located or border on the Gulf of Mexico and have within their boundaries beaches that are suitable for park purposes. The suitability of a beach for park purposes is established conclusively when the commissioners court of the county makes a finding that the beach located within its boundaries, but not located within the boundaries of an incorporated city, is suitable for park purposes.

(b) As long as an island or peninsula is not accessible by a public road or common carrier ferry facility, the provisions of this chapter do not apply to that island or peninsula.

(c) The provisions of this chapter do not interfere with, preempt, or in any manner restrict or usurp the authority of the land office over state-owned beaches.

(d) The provisions of this chapter do not prohibit the creation of, or limit the lawful actions of, a beach park board of trustees of a home-rule city as provided in Chapter 306, Local Government Code.

(e) The provisions of this chapter do not permit any interference with the right the public has under the provisions of Subchapter B, Chapter 61, to the free and unrestricted use of, and to ingress and egress to, the area bordering on the Gulf of Mexico from mean low tide to the line of vegetation, as that term is defined in Section 61.001. A county, county official, or anyone acting under the authority of this chapter may not exercise any authority, contract out a right to exercise authority, or otherwise delegate authority beyond that specifically granted to it in Sections 61.122 through 61.128 over that area notwithstanding any of the specific provisions of this chapter. The rights established in Subchapters B and D, Chapter 61, are paramount over the rights or interests that might otherwise be created by the provisions of this chapter, and nothing in this chapter encroaches on those rights or upon land, or interests in land, that may ultimately be held subject to those rights.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2492, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 13.001, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 62.002. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "board" means the Beach Park Board of Trustees.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2493, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

SUBCHAPTER B. CREATION OF BOARD

Sec. 62.011. PURPOSE AND AUTHORITY. A county located or bordering on the Gulf of Mexico with a beach suitable for park purposes may create a board in the manner provided in this subchapter for the purpose of improving, equipping, maintaining, financing, and operating a public park or parks, or any facilities owned by the county, or to be acquired by the county, or to be managed by the county under the terms of a written contract. The board, to be designated Beach Park Board of Trustees, has the powers and duties specified in this chapter.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2493, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.012. METHOD OF CREATING BOARD. A board may be created after a favorable majority vote of the qualified voters of the county voting at an election held on the proposition.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2493, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.013. ELECTION. (a) The election shall be called by the commissioners court.

(b) Notice of the election shall be given in the manner provided by Chapter 1251, Government Code.

(c) The ballots shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "Establishing a beach park board of trustees."

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2493, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.353, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER C. ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

Sec. 62.041. MEMBERS OF BOARD. (a) The board is composed of seven members appointed by the commissioners court.

(b) One board member shall be a member of the commissioners court.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2493, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.042. TERM OF OFFICE. (a) With the exception of the trustees first appointed, a trustee serves for a term of two years from the date of appointment.

(b) At the time of the appointment of the first trustees, the commissioners court shall designate three trustees to serve for one year and four trustees to serve for two years.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2494, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.043. OATH AND BOND. (a) A trustee shall qualify within 15 days after his appointment by taking the official oath and filing a good and sufficient bond with the county clerk.

(b) The bond shall be approved by the commissioners court, payable to the county, in a sum not to exceed $5,000 as approved by the commissioners court of the county, and conditioned on the faithful performance of the duties of the trustee, including his proper handling of all money which may come into his hands in his capacity as a member of the board.

(c) The cost of the bond shall be paid by the board.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2494, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.044. COMPENSATION; EXPENSES. A trustee serves without compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his official duties.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2494, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.045. VACANCY. A vacancy on the board shall be filled by appointment of the commissioners court.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2494, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.046. OFFICERS OF BOARD. (a) On the appointment of the first trustees, the commissioners court shall designate one of the trustees to serve as chairman of the board for a period of one year.

(b) After the first year the board annually shall elect a chairman, a vice-chairman, a secretary, and a treasurer from among its members. The office of secretary and treasurer may be held by the same person.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2494, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.047. PARK MANAGER. The board may employ and compensate a manager for any parks or facilities and may give him full authority in the management and operation of the park or parks or facilities subject only to the direction and orders of the board.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2494, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.048. LEGAL SERVICES. (a) The board may call on the county attorney of the county for the legal services it requires.

(b) In lieu of or in addition to the county attorney, the board may employ and compensate its own counsel and legal staff.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2494, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.049. EMPLOYEES OF BOARD. (a) The board may employ temporary or permanent secretaries, stenographers, bookkeepers, accountants, technical experts, and other agents and employees it requires.

(b) The board shall determine the qualifications, duties, and compensation of its employees.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2494, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.050. MEETINGS. (a) The board shall hold regular meetings at times set by the board.

(b) The board may hold special meetings at the times business or necessity requires. Special meetings may be called by the chairman or any three members of the board.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2495, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.051. BOARD RECORDS. (a) The board shall keep a true and full record of all its meetings and proceedings and maintain the records of the board in a secure manner.

(b) The board may contract with the commissioners court of the county to have the county keep and maintain its records.

(c) All the records are the property of the board and are subject to inspection by the commissioners court at all reasonable times.

(d) The preservation, microfilming, destruction, or other disposition of the records of the board is subject to the requirements of Subtitle C, Title 6, Local Government Code, and rules adopted under that subtitle.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2495, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 65, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 62.052. MANAGEMENT OF FUNDS. The money belonging to or under control of the board shall be deposited and secured in the same manner prescribed by law for county funds.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2495, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.053. AUDIT. Independent auditors selected by the board shall make an annual audit of all financial transactions and records of the board.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2495, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.054. COURT ACTIONS. The board may sue and be sued in its own name.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2495, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.055. SEAL. The board shall adopt a seal which shall be placed on all leases, deeds, and other instruments usually executed under seal and on other instruments required by the board.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2495, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

SUBCHAPTER D. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 62.091. LAND UNDER JURISDICTION, MANAGEMENT, AND CONTROL. (a) The following land is under the jurisdiction of the board:

(1) public beaches owned in fee by the county; and

(2) land used as parks in connection with public beaches not located inside the boundaries of an incorporated city and not inside the area bordering on the Gulf of Mexico from the line of mean low tide to the line of vegetation as that term is defined in Section 61.001.

(b) The Commissioners Court may designate the following land to be under the management and control of the board:

(1) additional parks and facilities owned by the county; or

(2) additional parks and facilities to be managed by the county under the terms of a written contract.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2495, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 13.002, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 62.092. PRIORITY OF JURISDICTION. (a) The board has no jurisdiction over a public beach located inside the boundaries of the county that has been designated a national park, national seashore, or state park.

(b) The authority of the board preempts the right of the county board of park commissioners to act with regard to a beach, park, or facility within the jurisdiction of the board.

(c) The provisions of this chapter are cumulative of other laws relating to county parks but take precedence in the event of conflict.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2495, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.093. PARK AUTHORITY. The board may manage, operate, maintain, equip, improve, and finance:

(1) an existing public park placed under its jurisdiction by the commissioners court; or

(2) additional parks acquired by gift or otherwise but not acquired by the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2496, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 13.003(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 62.094. FEE CHARGED. The board may charge and collect a reasonable fee for access or entrance to or parking on the land under its jurisdiction, other than public beaches owned by the county, or use of a facility located on land under its jurisdiction.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2496, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.095. USE OF FUNDS. (a) The board may accept, receive, and spend gifts of money or other things of value from any person for the purpose of performing any function, power, or authority vested in the board and funds from the county that are appropriated by the county from time to time for the purpose of improving, equipping, maintaining, operating, and promoting recreational facilities under the board's supervision and control.

(b) The board may spend money appropriated by the commissioners court for the purpose of cleaning and maintaining public beaches and land within its jurisdiction, including money appropriated to the commissioners court by the state for that purpose.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2496, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.096. CONTRACTS, LEASES, AND OTHER AGREEMENTS RELATING TO LAND AND FACILITIES. The board may enter into a contract, lease, or other agreement connected with, incident to, or affecting the financing, construction, equipping, maintenance, or operation of facilities located or to be located on or pertaining to land under its jurisdiction or facilities under its control and may execute and perform its lawful powers and functions on land leased from others.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2496, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.097. CONTRACTS, LEASES, AND OTHER AGREEMENTS RELATING TO MANAGEMENT, OPERATION, AND MAINTENANCE OF LAND AND FACILITIES. The board may enter into any contract, lease, or agreement with any person for a period of not more than 40 years relating to the management, operation, and maintenance of a concession, facility, improvement, leasehold, land, or other property over which the board has jurisdiction and control.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2496, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.098. CONTRACTS WITH OTHER GOVERNMENTAL AGENCIES. To accomplish any purpose authorized in this chapter, the board may enter into contracts with:

(1) adjacent counties;

(2) boards in adjacent counties; and

(3) boards in cities of the same county in which the board has jurisdiction.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2496, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.099. ADVERTISING. The board may publish brochures and otherwise advertise the county's recreational advantages for the purpose of attracting tourists, residents, and other users of the public facilities operated by the board.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2497, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 13.003(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 62.100. RULES. The board may adopt and enforce reasonable rules for the use of parks and facilities under the jurisdiction and control of the board by the public or by lessees, concessionaires, and other persons carrying on a business activity inside the area of the public parks and facilities.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2497, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.101. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature in enacting the provisions of this chapter that the rights established or recognized in Subchapters B and D of Chapter 61 of this code are paramount over any rights or interests that might otherwise be considered created by this chapter, and none of the provisions of this chapter may trench on those rights or encroach on land or interests in land that may ultimately be held subject to those rights.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2497, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

SUBCHAPTER E. ISSUANCE OF BONDS

Sec. 62.131. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE BONDS. For the purpose of acquiring, developing, improving, and enlarging public recreational areas and facilities, the board may issue revenue bonds payable solely from:

(1) the revenue of all or any designated part of the properties or facilities under the jurisdiction and control of the board; or

(2) any other source of funds the board may wish to dedicate for that purpose.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2497, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 13.003(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 62.132. FORMAL REQUIREMENTS OF BONDS. (a) The bonds may be issued by resolution adopted by the board without the necessity of an election.

(b) The bonds may be issued in the name of the board in one or more installments or series and shall mature serially or otherwise within 40 years from their date or dates.

(c) The bonds shall be issued on the terms and conditions, with regard to the security, manner, place, and time of payment, pledge of designated revenue, redemption before maturity, and the issuance of additional parity or junior lien bonds, that the board specifies in the resolution or resolutions authorizing the bonds.

(d) The bonds shall be executed by the chairman and secretary of the board and shall be signed by the chairman and secretary or shall bear the facsimile signature of either or both.

(e) The bonds shall display the seal of the board, which may be impressed, printed, or lithographed on the bonds.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2497, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.133. SALE OF BONDS. The board shall sell the bonds on the best terms obtainable.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2497, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 13.003(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 62.134. APPROVAL AND REGISTRATION. The bonds shall not be delivered until a transcript of the proceedings authorizing their issuance has been submitted to the attorney general and approved as to legality by the attorney general and the bonds are registered by the comptroller of public accounts.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2497, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.135. AUTHORIZED INVESTMENTS. The bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter are legal and authorized investments for banks, saving banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, insurance companies, fiduciaries, trustees, guardians, and for the sinking funds of cities, towns, villages, counties, school districts, or other political corporations or subdivisions of the state.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2498, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.136. SECURITY FOR DEPOSITS. The bonds are eligible to secure the deposit of public funds of the state and public funds of cities, towns, villages, or other political corporations or subdivisions of the state and are lawful and sufficient security for deposits to the extent of their face value when accompanied by all unmatured interest coupons appurtenant to them.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2498, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.137. TAX BONDS. (a) The board shall not issue bonds payable in whole or in part from ad valorem taxes.

(b) The board may receive and spend the proceeds of bonds payable from taxes which are issued by the governing body of the county for park purposes after the bonds are authorized at an election held in the manner required by law.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2498, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 62.138. REFUNDING BONDS. (a) The board may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding one or more series or installments of outstanding original or refunding bonds of the board.

(b) The refunding bonds shall be issued, approved as to legality by the attorney general, and registered by the comptroller of public accounts in the manner and on the terms and conditions provided in this subchapter for the issuance of original revenue bonds.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 2498, ch. 871, art. I, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

SUBCHAPTER F. DISSOLUTION OF BOARD

Sec. 62.161. ORDER CALLING ELECTION TO DISSOLVE; NOTICE OF ELECTION. (a) The commissioners court may order an election to dissolve a board.

(b) The commissioners court shall give notice of the election. The notice must include:

(1) the name of the board;

(2) the proposal that the board be dissolved; and

(3) the place, date, and time of the election.

(c) The notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week for two consecutive weeks. The first publication must occur not later than the 21st day before the date on which the election will be held.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1135, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1997.

Sec. 62.162. ELECTION TO DISSOLVE. (a) An election to dissolve a board shall be held on the first authorized uniform election date prescribed by the Election Code that allows sufficient time to comply with the requirements of law and that occurs after the date on which the commissioners court orders the election.

(b) The ballot shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the following: "Dissolving the [name of county] Beach Park Board of Trustees and transferring its parks jurisdiction, assets and liabilities to the [name of county] Commissioners Court."

(c) A copy of the tabulation of results shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which the board is located.

(d) If a majority of those voting at the election vote to dissolve the board, the board and the commissioners court shall proceed with dissolution. An election to create a new board under this chapter in that county may not be held for at least one year after dissolution.

(e) If a majority of those voting at the election vote against dissolving the board, the commissioners court may not order another election on the issue before the first anniversary of the date of the canvass of the election.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1135, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1997.

Sec. 62.163. ADMINISTRATION OF PROPERTY, DEBTS, AND ASSETS AFTER DISSOLUTION. (a) After a vote to dissolve a board, the board shall continue to control and administer the property, debts, and assets of the board until:

(1) the board executes and files a written assignment of all its property, debts, and assets to the commissioners court; and

(2) the commissioners court executes and files in its minutes an acceptance and assumption of the property, debts, and assets of the board.

(b) The assignment prescribed by Subsection (a) must be filed with the commissioners court not later than the 30th day after the date of the canvass of the election.

(c) After the commissioners court determines that the requirements of this section have been fulfilled, the commissioners court shall enter an order dissolving the board.

(d) Each trustee is discharged from liability under the trustee's bond on entry of the order prescribed by Subsection (c).

(e) An employee or contract of the board becomes an employee or contract of the county, acting by and through its commissioners court, on entry of the order prescribed by Subsection (c).

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1135, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1997.